Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-159
Madison.

The county of Madison is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-one, north, of range one, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-four, north, of range one, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-four, north, of range four, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township twenty-one, north, of range four, west; thence east to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 35, p. 218;

R.S.1913, § 872;

C.S.1922, § 774;

C.S.1929, § 25-161;

R.S.1943, § 22-159.